Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-193
York.

The county of York is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township nine, north, of range four, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township nine, north, of range one, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township twelve, north, of range one, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twelve, north, of range four, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 56, p. 223;

R.S.1913, § 908;

C.S.1922, § 810;

C.S.1929, § 25-197;

R.S.1943, § 22-193.